Utah statutes.
53A-2-112.   Definitions.
As used in Sections 53A-2-113 through 53A-2-116:
(1)  "Consolidation" means the merger of two or more school districts into a
single administrative unit.
(2)  "Restructuring" means the transfer of territory from one school district
to another school district.
